en: Zucchini, Courgettes
bg: Тиквички
de: Zucchini
es: Calabacines, Zucchini
fi: kesäkurpitsa
fr: Courgettes
hr: Tikvica
it: Zucchine
ja: ズッキーニ
la: Cucurbita pepo var. Zucchini
nl: Courgettes
pl: Cukinie, Cukinia, Kabaczek, Kabaczki
tr: Kabak

en: Prepared zucchini
fr: Courgettes cuisinées, courgettes préparées

en: Fresh zucchini
bg: Пресни тиквички
de: Frische Zucchini
es: Calabacín fresco
fr: Courgettes fraîches
hr: Svježe tikvice
it: Zucchine fresche

en: Courgette pulp and peel, Zucchini pulp and peel
fr: Pulpe et peau de courgette

en: Cooked pulp and peel courgette, Cooked pulp and peel zucchini
fr: Pulpe et peau de courgette cuite

en: Frozen courgette pulp and peel, Frozen zucchini pulp and peel
fr: Pulpe et peau de courgette surgelée

en: Mixed vegetables, vegetable mixes
bg: Паприкаш
de: Gemüse Mischung
es: Mezclas de verduras y hortalizas
fr: Mélanges de légumes
hr: Miješano povrće
it: Misti di verdure
nl: Groentemengsels, Gemengde groenten
pl: Mieszanka warzyw, Mix warzyw

en: Fresh mixed vegetables, Mixed fresh vegetables, fresh vegetable mixes
de: Frische Gemüse Mischung
es: Mezclas de verduras y hortalizas frescas
fr: Mélanges de légumes frais
hr: Svježe miješano povrće
nl: Verse groentemengsels
pl: Mieszanka świeżych warzyw, Mix świeżych warzyw

en: Mixtures of vegetables for broth
de: Suppengemüse
es: Mezclas de verduras y hortalizas para caldo
fr: Mélanges de légumes pour bouillon
hr: Mješavine povrća za juhu
pl: Włoszczyzna, Mieszanka warzyw na bulion

en: Mixed vegetables for soups
es: Mezclas de verduras y hortalizas para sopa, Mezclas de vegetales para sopa
fr: Mélanges de légumes pour soupes

en: Frozen mixed vegetables for soups
fr: Légumes surgelés pour potage

en: Leaf salads, Green salads
de: Blattsalate
es: Ensaladas vegetales
fi: lehtisalaatit
fr: Salades vertes, salades feuilles
hr: Lisnate salate
it: Insalate a foglia
ja: 葉野菜サラダ, 葉物サラダ
nl: Bladsla
pl: Sałaty liściaste

it: Radicchio
ja: ラディッキオ

en: Salads without dressing
fr: Crudités sans assaisonnement
hr: Salate bez dresinga
nl: Rauwkost (zonder saus)

en: corn salad, common cornsalad, lamb's lettuce, fetticus, feldsalat, nut lettuce, field salad, rapunzel, doucette, raiponce
de: Feldsalat, Rapunzel, Rapunzelsalat
es: Canónigos
et: Põldkännak
eu: Ardi-mihi
fi: Vuonankaali
fr: mâches, mâche
hr: Matovilac
hu: salátagalambbegy
it: Songino
ja: ノヂシャ
ko: 콘샐러드
la: Valerianella locusta
nb: Vårsalat
nl: veldsla
pl: Roszponka, Roszpunka, Rapunkuł
pt: Canónigos
ru: Полевой салат
sr: Матовилац
sv: Vårklynne
wa: Doûcete
zh: 萵苣纈草

en: rocket, arugula, garden rocket, eruca, rucola, rucoli, rugula, colewort, roquette, salad rocket
ar: جرجير
az: Əkin indausu
be: Індаў пасяўны
bg: рукола, ерука, посевна ерука
bn: রকেট সালাদ
br: roketez
co: rutulella
cs: roketa setá
da: rucola, salatsennep
de: Rucola, Garten-Senfrauke
el: Ρόκα
eo: Kultiva eruko
es: rúcula, rúcola, rúgula
et: rukola, põld-võõrkapsas
fa: منداب
fi: sinappikaali, rucola
fr: roquette, riquette
ga: ruachán
gl: Eiruga
he: בן-חרדל מצוי
hr: Raketa
hu: Borsmustár, rukkola
hy: Ճարճրուկ ցանովի
is: Klettasalat
it: ruchetta, rughetta, rucola, ruca
ja: ルッコラ
ka: რუკოლა
kk: Егістік қышатүс
ko: 루콜라
la: Eruca vesicaria, Eruca sativa Mill, Eruca vesicaria subsp. sativa, Brassica eruca L.
lt: Rukola
mt: eruka
nb: ruccola
nl: rucola, raketsla, zwaardherik
pa: ਤਾਰਾਮੀਰਾ
pl: Rokietta siewna, rukolą
pt: rúcula
ro: Voinicică
ru: руккола
sd: ڄانڀو
sq: sallatë manushaqeje
sr: Рукола
sv: Rucola, Rucolasallad, Ruccola, Ruccolasallad
tr: Roka
uk: Рукола
zh: 芝麻菜

en: Garden cress
af: waterkers
am: ፌጦ
ar: رشاد مزروع
az: Vəzəri-bozalaq
be: Клапоўнік пасяўны
bg: кресон
bn: হালিম শাক
bs: Obična grbaštica
ca: morritort
cs: řeřicha zahradní
cy: Pupurlys yr ardd
da: Have-Karse
de: Gartenkresse
el: Κάρδαμο
eo: Ĝardenkreso
es: Berros hortelanos
et: salatkress
fa: شاهی
ff: Lapsur
fi: vihanneskrassi
fr: Cresson alénois
ga: Biolar gairdín
gu: અશેળિયો
hr: Vrtna kreša
hu: kerti zsázsa
hy: կոտեմ
is: Karsi
it: crescione di giardino
ja: コショウソウ
ka: წიწმატი
kk: Кресс салат
ko: 큰다닥냉이
kw: beler lowarth
la: Lepidium sativum
lt: Sėjamoji pipirnė
mk: добрејка
ml: ആശാളി
mr: अहाळीव
nb: Karse
ne: चम्सुर
nl: tuinkers
nn: Matkarse
os: Дудгæ
pl: Pieprzyca siewna
pt: Agrião-mouro
qu: Willk'uyuyu
ro: Creson
ru: кресс-салат
sh: Obična grbaštica
sk: Žerucha záhradná
sv: Smörgåskrasse
te: ఆడలవిటల
th: เทียนแดง
tr: tere
uk: кресс-салат
ur: ہالوں
zh: 水芹

en: Mix of salad leaves
sv: Salladsmixer, Salladsmixar, Salladsmix

en: Mesclun, Mix of baby salad leaves
xx: Mesclun
fr: Mesclun, Mélange de jeunes pousses de salade
sv: Småbladsmixer, Småbladsmixar, Småbladsmix

en: Watercress, watercress
de: Brunnenkresse
es: Berros, Berros de agua, Mastuerzos de agua
fr: Cresson, Cresson de fontaine, Cresson d’eau
hr: Potočarka
ja: オランダガラシ
la: Nasturtium officinale
nl: Witte waterkers